Tennessee, session 114, HB0300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-210, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) A motor vehicle that is found with an installed license plate flipper may be
seized or impounded by a law enforcement officer as evidence; provided, that the owner
or operator of the motor vehicle, if present, must be provided the opportunity to promptly
remove the license plate flipper if it can be removed safely. If the license plate flipper is
removed, then the law enforcement officer may seize only the license plate flipper as
contraband. If the motor vehicle is impounded, then the owner of the vehicle is
responsible for payment of towing and impounding fees and reasonable costs to remove
the license plate flipper.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0300
000041
- 1 -